Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.700

Employee assistance program—Intent.

The legislature finds that:

(1) Assisting employees in resolving personal problems that impair their performance will result in a more productive workforce, better morale, reduced stress, reduced use of medical benefits, reduced absenteeism, lower turnover rates, and fewer accidents;

(2) A substantial number of employee problems can be identified and the employees referred to treatment by an employee assistance program;

(3) The state, as an employer, desires to foster a working environment that promotes safety and productivity as well as the health and well-being of its employees.

Therefore, it is the purpose of RCW 41.04.710 through 41.04.730 to assist state employees by establishing a state employee assistance program.

[ 1990 c 60 s 301.]

NOTES:

Severability—Subheadings not law—1990 c 60: See notes following RCW 41.06.070.